Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.750

Community assistance referral and education program—Review of certification and training—Recommendations to the legislature.

The department of health must review the professional certification and training of health professionals participating in a community assistance referral and education program, review the certification and training requirements in other states with similar programs, and coordinate with the health care authority to link the certification requirements with the covered health care services recommended for payment in RCW 74.09.335. The department shall submit recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature for any changes and suggestions for implementation within six months of the development of the payment standards.

[ 2017 c 273 s 3.]